Washington statutes.
RCW 39.33.020

Disposal of surplus property—Hearing—Notice.

Before disposing of surplus property with an estimated value of more than fifty thousand dollars, the state or a political subdivision shall hold a public hearing in the county where the property or the greatest portion thereof is located. At least ten days but not more than twenty-five days prior to the hearing, there shall be published a public notice of reasonable size in display advertising form, setting forth the date, time, and place of the hearing at least once in a newspaper of general circulation in the area where the property is located. A news release pertaining to the hearing shall be disseminated among printed and electronic media in the area where the property is located. If real property is involved, the public notice and news release shall identify the property using a description which can easily be understood by the public. If the surplus is real property, the public notice and news release shall also describe the proposed use of the lands involved. If there is a failure to substantially comply with the procedures set forth in this section, then the sale, transfer, exchange, lease, or other disposal shall be subject to being declared invalid by a court. Any such suit must be brought within one year from the date of the disposal agreement.

[ 1995 c 123 s 1; 1981 c 96 s 2.]